Washington statutes.
RCW 36.01.225

Authority to regulate placement or use of homes—Regulation of manufactured homes—Restrictions on location of manufactured/mobile homes and entry or removal of recreational vehicles used as primary residences.

(1) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of discriminating against consumers' choices in the placement or use of a home in such a manner that is not equally applicable to all homes. Homes built to 42 U.S.C. Sec. 5401-5403 standards (as amended in 2000) must be regulated for the purposes of siting in the same manner as site built homes, factory built homes, or homes built to any other state construction or local design standard. However, except as provided in subsection (2) of this section, any county may require that:

(a) A manufactured home be a new manufactured home;

(b) The manufactured home be set upon a permanent foundation, as specified by the manufacturer, and that the space from the bottom of the home to the ground be enclosed by concrete or an approved concrete product which can be either load bearing or decorative;

(c) The manufactured home comply with all local design standards applicable to all other homes within the neighborhood in which the manufactured home is to be located;

(d) The home is thermally equivalent to the state energy code; and

(e) The manufactured home otherwise meets all other requirements for a designated manufactured home as defined in RCW 35.63.160.

(2)(a) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of restricting the location of manufactured/mobile homes in manufactured/mobile home communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, which were legally in existence before June 12, 2008, based exclusively on the age or dimensions of the manufactured/mobile home.

(b) A county may not prohibit the siting of a manufactured/mobile home on an existing lot based solely on lack of compliance with existing separation and setback requirements that regulate the distance between homes.

(c) A county is not precluded by (a) or (b) of this subsection from restricting the location of a manufactured/mobile home in manufactured/mobile home communities for any other reason including, but not limited to, failure to comply with fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws related to manufactured/mobile homes.

(3) A county may not adopt an ordinance that has the effect, directly or indirectly, of preventing the entry or requiring the removal of a recreational vehicle used as a primary residence in manufactured/mobile home communities, as defined in RCW 59.20.030, unless the recreational vehicle fails to comply with the fire, safety, or other local ordinances or state laws related to recreational vehicles.

(4) This section does not override any legally recorded covenants or deed restrictions of record.

(5) This section does not affect the authority granted under chapter 43.22 RCW.

[ 2019 c 390 s 16; 2009 c 79 s 3; 2008 c 117 s 3; 2004 c 256 s 4.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—2019 c 390: See note following RCW 59.21.005.

Tax preference performance statement and expiration—2019 c 390: See note following RCW 84.36.560.

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2004 c 256: See notes following RCW 35.21.684.